Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF988.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [138.255] MEETINGS AND DATA REGARDING STATE-OWNED PROPERTIES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Meetings of the executive council. new text end new text begin A meeting in which the executive council discusses, makes decisions regarding, or receives information related to state-owned historic sites under section 138.662, state-owned historic places designated under section 138.663, or state-owned places on the National Register of Historic Places, is subject to chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Public data. new text end new text begin Data maintained by the Minnesota Historical Society related to state-owned historic sites under section 138.662, state-owned historic places designated under section 138.663, and state-owned places on the National Register of Historic Places is public data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivisions 14 and 15. new text end